Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.021

Requirements for licensing.

(1) The department shall issue a license to any applicant who, as determined by the secretary:

(a) Has successfully completed an educational program approved by the secretary. This educational program shall include coursework encompassing the subject areas within the scope of the license to practice dental hygiene in the state of Washington;

(b) Has successfully completed an examination administered or approved by the dental hygiene examining committee; and

(c) Has not engaged in unprofessional conduct or is not unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or mental impairment.

(2) Applications for licensure must comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees established according to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 10; 1995 c 198 s 4; 1991 c 3 s 46; 1989 c 202 s 1.]